Vermont, session 2025-2026, H132.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 4866 is added to read:
§ 4866. TAKING OF FURBEARERS; USE OF BAIT
(a) As used in this section, “bait” means any animal, vegetable, fruit, or
mineral matter placed with the intention of attracting wildlife. “Bait” does not
mean animal, vegetable, or fruit matter placed by a person subject to the
Required Agricultural Practices as part of standard agricultural production.
VT LEG #379046 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.132
2025 Page 2 of 2
(b) No person shall take a fur-bearing animal by gun, bow and arrow, or
crossbow with the use of bait.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 4502(b) is amended to read:
(b) A person violating provisions of this part shall receive points for
convictions in accordance with the following schedule (all sections are in this
title of the Vermont Statutes Annotated):
(1) Except for biological collection violations determined to be nonpoint
violations under the rules of the Board, five points shall be assessed for any
violation of statutes or rules adopted under this part except those listed in
subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.
(2) Ten points shall be assessed for:
* * *
(TT) § 4716. Participating in a coyote-hunting competition.
(UU) § 4516. Taking furbearers by gun, bow and arrow, or crossbow
with the use of bait.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379046 v.1